Illinois, session 104th, SB2534.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 9following divisions of the Department of Corrections for the 10fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:11FOR OPERATIONS12GENERAL OFFICE13  For Personal Services............................39,484,00014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security..................................3,020,00016  For Contractual Services.........................16,500,00017  For Travel...........................................90,00018  For Commodities.....................................400,00019  For Printing.........................................40,00020  For Equipment.....................................4,590,00021  For Electronic Data Processing...................33,500,00022  For Telecommunication Services....................4,750,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................240,000  SB2534- 2 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Tort Claims..................................12,500,0002  For Refunds...........................................5,0003    Total                                        $115,119,000 4STATEWIDE SERVICES AND GRANTS 5    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 7Corrections for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:8Payable from the General Revenue Fund:9  For Sheriffs' Fees for Conveying Prisoners..........249,90010  For the State's share of Assistant State's11   Attorney's salaries - reimbursement12   to counties pursuant to Chapter 55 of13   the Illinois Compiled Statutes.....................200,20014  For Repairs, Maintenance, and Other15   Capital Improvements............................11,500,00016    Total                                         $11,950,100 17    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Department of Corrections for the objects and purposes 20hereinafter named:21Payable from Department of Corrections 22 Reimbursement and Education Fund:23  For payment of expenses associated24   with School District Programs....................5,000,000  SB2534- 3 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For payment of expenses associated2   with federal programs, including,3   but not limited to, construction of4   additional beds, treatment programs,5   and juvenile supervision.........................5,000,0006  For payment of expenses associated7   with miscellaneous programs, including,8   but not limited to, medical costs, food expenditures,9   and various construction costs..................59,400,00010  For payment of expenses associated11   with IT infrastructure upgrades, including,12   but not limited to, device purchases,13   repairs, maintenance, and other capital14   improvements....................................45,000,00015    Total                                        $114,400,000 16    Section 15. The amount of $26,000,000, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 18Corrections from the General Revenue Fund for expenses related 19to statewide hospitalization services. 20    Section 20. The following named sums, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 22purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General 23Revenue Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of 24the Department of Corrections:  SB2534- 4 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1EDUCATION SERVICES2  For Personal Services............................20,808,0003  For Student, Member, and Inmate4   Compensation.............................................05  For State Contributions to Social Security .......1,591,0006  For Contractual Services.........................13,000,0007  For Travel............................................7,5008  For Commodities.....................................300,0009  For Printing.........................................58,50010  For Equipment........................................75,00011  For Telecommunication Services........................4,00012  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................4,50013  Total                                           $35,848,500 14PAROLE15For Personal Services..............................43,355,00016  For State Contributions to17   Social Security..................................3,316,00018  For Contractual Services.........................14,500,00019  For Travel..........................................222,50020For Travel and Allowances for Committed,21   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................37,50022  For Commodities......................................31,00023  For Printing..........................................6,80024  For Equipment........................................50,00025  For Telecommunication Services....................5,600,000  SB2534- 5 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Operation of Auto Equipment...................1,500,0002    Total                                         $68,618,800 3RE-ENTRY SERVICES4  For Personal Services............................13,468,0005  For Student, Member, and Inmate6   Compensation........................................51,6007  For State Contributions to8   Social Security..................................1,030,0009  For Contractual Services.........................32,000,00010  For Travel...........................................50,00011  For Travel and Allowances for Committed, 12   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners........................013  For Commodities.....................................100,00014  For Printing..........................................7,00015  For Equipment.......................................140,00016  For Telecommunication Services.......................89,00017  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................40,00018    Total                                         $46,975,600 19FIELD SERVICES20  For Personal Services............................12,462,00021  For State Contributions to22   Social Security....................................953,00023  For Contractual Services........................104,500,00024  For Travel...........................................65,000  SB2534- 6 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Commodities...................................1,434,0002  For Printing..........................................4,0003  For Equipment.......................................100,0004  For Telecommunication Services....................1,200,0005  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................340,0006    Total                                        $121,058,000 7    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 9the Department of Corrections from the General Revenue Fund 10for:11BIG MUDDY RIVER CORRECTIONAL CENTER12  For Personal Services............................35,338,00013  For Student, Member, and Inmate14   Compensation.......................................362,50015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security..................................2,703,00017  For Contractual Services.........................12,300,00018  For Travel...........................................18,00019  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,20   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,00021  For Commodities...................................2,798,10022  For Printing.........................................30,00023  For Equipment........................................75,00024  For Telecommunication Services......................102,00025  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................175,000  SB2534- 7 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1    Total                                         $53,914,6002CENTRALIA CORRECTIONAL CENTER3  For Personal Services............................42,253,0004  For Student, Member, and Inmate5   Compensation.......................................521,9006  For State Contributions to7   Social Security..................................3,232,0008  For Contractual Services..........................8,500,0009  For Travel...........................................22,00010  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,11   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,50012  For Commodities...................................2,609,50013  For Printing.........................................22,50014  For Equipment.......................................365,00015  For Telecommunication Services.......................86,10016  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................55,00017    Total                                         $57,680,50018DANVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER19  For Personal Services............................32,883,00020  For Student, Member, and Inmate21   Compensation.......................................535,80022  For State Contributions to23   Social Security..................................2,515,00024  For Contractual Services.........................11,663,00025  For Travel...........................................36,00026  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,  SB2534- 8 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................7,0002  For Commodities...................................3,585,7003  For Printing.........................................27,3004  For Equipment.......................................140,0005  For Telecommunication Services.......................84,8006  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................82,0007    Total                                         $51,559,6008DECATUR CORRECTIONAL CENTER9  For Personal Services............................19,543,00010  For Student, Member, and Inmate11   Compensation.......................................110,70012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security..................................1,495,00014  For Contractual Services..........................5,993,00015  For Travel............................................5,00016  For Travel and Allowances for17   Committed, Paroled, and18   Discharged Prisoners.................................5,00019  For Commodities.....................................923,00020  For Printing.........................................16,00021  For Equipment.......................................130,00022  For Telecommunication Services.......................37,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................55,00024    Total                                         $28,312,70025DIXON CORRECTIONAL CENTER26  For Personal Services............................59,631,000  SB2534- 9 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Student, Member, and Inmate2   Compensation.......................................420,7003  For State Contributions to4   Social Security..................................4,561,0005  For Contractual Services.........................26,690,0006  For Travel...........................................58,0007  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,8   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................6,3009  For Commodities...................................3,000,00010  For Printing.........................................48,00011  For Equipment.......................................475,00012  For Telecommunication Services......................188,00013  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................245,00014    Total                                         $95,323,00015EAST MOLINE CORRECTIONAL CENTER16  For Personal Services............................29,694,00017  For Student, Member, and Inmate18   Compensation.......................................165,40019  For State Contributions to20   Social Security..................................2,271,00021  For Contractual Services..........................6,741,00022  For Travel...........................................15,00023  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,24   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................7,00025  For Commodities...................................1,612,00026  For Printing.........................................15,000  SB2534- 10 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Equipment.......................................430,0002  For Telecommunication Services......................188,0003  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................150,0004    Total                                         $41,288,4005SOUTHWESTERN ILLINOIS CORRECTIONAL CENTER6  For Personal Services............................22,585,0007  For Student, Member, and Inmate8   Compensation.......................................165,8009  For State Contributions to10   Social Security..................................1,727,00011  For Contractual Services.........................10,605,00012  For Travel...........................................13,00013  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,14   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................8,00015  For Commodities...................................1,335,60016  For Printing.........................................15,50017  For Equipment........................................75,00018  For Telecommunication Services.......................59,00019  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................35,00020    Total                                         $36,643,90021KEWANEE LIFE SKILLS RE-ENTRY CENTER22  For Personal Services............................16,762,00023  For Student, Member, and Inmate24   Compensation........................................78,90025  For State Contributions to26   Social Security..................................1,282,000  SB2534- 11 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Contractual Services..........................3,649,0002  For Travel............................................5,0003  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,4   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................1,2005  For Commodities.....................................783,0006  For Printing.........................................13,0007  For Equipment........................................60,0008  For Telecommunication Services......................150,0009  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................51,00010    Total                                         $22,835,10011GRAHAM CORRECTIONAL CENTER12  For Personal Services............................48,898,00013  For Student, Member, and Inmate14   Compensation.......................................452,30015  For State Contributions to Social Security........3,740,00016  For Contractual Services.........................13,730,00017  For Travel...........................................60,00018  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,19   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................5,00020  For Commodities...................................3,399,90021  For Printing.........................................33,50022  For Equipment.......................................275,00023  For Telecommunication Services.......................58,80024  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................150,00025    Total                                         $70,802,50026ILLINOIS RIVER CORRECTIONAL CENTER  SB2534- 12 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Personal Services............................35,741,0002  For Student, Member, and Inmate3   Compensation.......................................509,1004  For State Contributions to Social Security .......2,734,0005  For Contractual Services.........................11,688,0006  For Travel...........................................30,0007  For Travel and Allowance for Committed,8   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................15,5009  For Commodities...................................7,889,20010  For Printing.........................................33,00011  For Equipment........................................75,00012  For Telecommunication Services.......................69,30013  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................350,00014    Total                                         $59,134,10015HILL CORRECTIONAL CENTER16  For Personal Services............................29,976,00017  For Student, Member, and Inmate18   Compensation.......................................616,30019  For State Contributions to Social Security .......2,293,00020  For Contractual Services.........................13,310,00021  For Travel...........................................18,00022  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,23   Psroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................7,30024  For Commodities...................................8,642,00025  For Printing.........................................25,00026  For Equipment.......................................215,000  SB2534- 13 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Telecommunication Services.......................52,0002  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................245,0003    Total                                         $55,399,6004JACKSONVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER5  For Personal Services............................38,394,0006  For Student, Member, and Inmate7   Compensation.......................................276,0008  For State Contributions to9   Social Security..................................2,937,00010  For Contractual Services..........................6,228,00011  For Travel............................................7,50012  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,13   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................15,00014  For Commodities...................................2,233,80015  For Printing.........................................23,50016  For Equipment........................................75,00017  For Telecommunication Services.......................68,50018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................142,50019    Total                                         $50,400,80020JOLIET TREATMENT CENTER21  For Personal Services............................48,520,00022  For Student, Member, and Inmate23   Compensation........................................55,50024  For State Contributions to25   Social Security..................................3,401,00026  For Contractual Services.........................20,230,000  SB2534- 14 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Travel............................................7,0002  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,3   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................1,0004  For Commodities...................................1,063,0005  For Printing.........................................18,0006  For Equipment.......................................225,0007  For Telecommunication Services......................170,0008  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................58,0009    Total                                         $73,748,50010LAWRENCE CORRECTIONAL CENTER11  For Personal Services............................44,757,00012  For Student, Member, and Inmate13   Compensation.......................................196,50014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security..................................3,423,00016  For Contractual Services.........................15,052,00017  For Travel...........................................35,00018  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,19   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................2,80020  For Commodities...................................2,851,50021  For Printing.........................................25,00022  For Equipment.......................................200,00023  For Telecommunication Services.......................70,00024  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................142,00025    Total                                         $66,754,80026LINCOLN CORRECTIONAL CENTER  SB2534- 15 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Personal Services............................23,071,0002  For Student, Member, and Inmate3   Compensation.......................................209,6004  For State Contributions to5   Social Security..................................1,764,0006  For Contractual Services..........................6,668,0007  For Travel...........................................10,0008  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,9   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................16,00010  For Commodities...................................1,827,00011  For Printing.........................................14,70012  For Equipment........................................75,00013  For Telecommunication Services......................230,00014  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................87,00015    Total                                         $33,972,30016LOGAN CORRECTIONAL CENTER17  For Personal Services............................45,709,00018  For Student, Member, and Inmate19   Compensation.......................................421,60020  For State Contributions to21   Social Security..................................3,496,00022  For Contractual Services.........................29,662,00023  For Travel...........................................10,00024  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,25   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................11,00026  For Commodities...................................4,000,000  SB2534- 16 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Printing.........................................40,0002  For Equipment.......................................125,0003  For Telecommunication Services......................102,0004  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................135,0005    Total                                         $83,711,6006MENARD CORRECTIONAL CENTER7  For Personal Services............................80,702,0008  For Student, Member, and Inmate9   Compensation.......................................573,20010  For State Contributions to11   Social Security..................................6,173,00012  For Contractual Services.........................18,852,00013  For Travel..........................................100,00014  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,15   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................6,50016  For Commodities...................................6,079,60017  For Printing.........................................44,00018  For Equipment.......................................140,00019  For Telecommunication Services......................235,20020  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................355,00021    Total                                        $113,260,50022MURPHYSBORO LIFE SKILLS RE-ENTRY CENTER23  For Personal Services............................12,328,00024  For Student, Member, and Inmate25   Compensation........................................48,30026  For State Contributions to  SB2534- 17 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1   Social Security....................................943,0002  For Contractual Services..........................1,556,0003  For Travel..............................................5004  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,5   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners........................06  For Commodities.....................................623,3007  For Printing..........................................4,5008  For Equipment........................................60,0009  For Telecommunication Services.......................24,00010  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................1,00011    Total                                         $15,588,60012PINCKNEYVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER13  For Personal Services............................38,590,00014  For Student, Member, and Inmate15   Compensation.......................................456,80016  For State Contributions to17   Social Security..................................2,952,00018  For Contractual Services.........................14,877,00019  For Travel...........................................35,00020  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,21   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................11,30022  For Commodities...................................3,851,50023  For Printing.........................................31,50024  For Equipment........................................75,00025  For Telecommunication Services.......................57,70026  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................165,000  SB2534- 18 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1    Total                                         $61,102,8002PONTIAC CORRECTIONAL CENTER3  For Personal Services............................49,972,0004  For Student, Member, and Inmate5   Compensation.......................................201,2006  For State Contributions to7   Social Security..................................3,822,0008  For Contractual Services.........................20,971,0009  For Travel...........................................50,00010  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,11   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................3,50012  For Commodities...................................2,253,00013  For Printing.........................................31,00014  For Equipment.......................................125,00015  For Telecommunication Services......................310,00016  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................120,00017    Total                                         $77,858,70018ROBINSON CORRECTIONAL CENTER19  For Personal Services............................25,465,00020  For Student, Member, and21   Inmate Compensation................................284,00022  For State Contributions to 23   Social Security..................................1,948,00024  For Contractual Services..........................8,571,00025  For Travel...........................................22,00026  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,  SB2534- 19 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................19,0002  For Commodities...................................2,618,4003  For Printing.........................................16,9004  For Equipment.......................................150,0005  For Telecommunication Services.......................42,4006  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................52,0007    Total                                         $39,188,7008SHAWNEE CORRECTIONAL CENTER9  For Personal Services............................33,967,00010  For Student, Member, and11   Inmate Compensation................................521,80012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security..................................2,598,00014  For Contractual Services.........................11,755,00015  For Travel...........................................24,00016  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,17   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................29,00018  For Commodities...................................3,394,40019  For Printing.........................................29,20020  For Equipment.......................................235,00021  For Telecommunication Services.......................86,00022  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................75,00023    Total                                         $52,714,40024SHERIDAN CORRECTIONAL CENTER25  For Personal Services............................36,705,00026  For Student, Member, and Inmate  SB2534- 20 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1   Compensation.......................................351,9002  For State Contributions to3   Social Security..................................2,807,0004  For Contractual Services.........................16,900,0005  For Travel...........................................18,0006  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,7   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................8,5008  For Commodities...................................2,606,2009  For Printing.........................................35,00010  For Equipment.......................................225,00011  For Telecommunication Services.......................94,00012  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................61,00013    Total                                         $59,811,60014STATEVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER15  For Personal Services............................99,010,00016  For Student, Member, and Inmate17   Compensation.......................................178,00018  For State Contributions to19   Social Security..................................7,573,00020  For Contractual Services.........................36,421,00021  For Travel..........................................217,00022  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,23   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................55,00024  For Commodities...................................4,000,00025  For Printing.........................................68,00026  For Equipment........................................75,000  SB2534- 21 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Telecommunication Services......................250,0002  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................540,0003    Total                                        $148,387,0004TAYLORVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER5  For Personal Services............................29,208,0006  For Student, Member, and Inmate Compensation........369,2007  For State Contributions to 8   Social Security..................................2,234,0009  For Contractual Services..........................9,029,00010  For Travel............................................6,00011  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,12   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners..................13,500 13  For Commodities...................................2,047,50014  For Printing.........................................26,00015  For Equipment........................................75,00016  For Telecommunication Services.......................75,00017  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................50,00018    Total                                         $43,133,20019VANDALIA CORRECTIONAL CENTER20  For Personal Services............................34,426,00021  For Student, Member, and Inmate22   Compensation.......................................234,20023  For State Contributions to24   Social Security..................................2,633,00025  For Contractual Services..........................6,056,00026  For Travel............................................9,000  SB2534- 22 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,2   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................12,0003  For Commodities...................................6,050,0004  For Printing.........................................17,1005  For Equipment........................................75,0006  For Telecommunication Service........................44,2007  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................135,0008    Total                                         $49,691,5009VIENNA CORRECTIONAL CENTER10  For Personal Services............................33,696,00011  For Student, Member, and Inmate12   Compensation.......................................196,80013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security..................................2,577,00015  For Contractual Services..........................6,154,00016  For Travel...........................................14,00017  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,18   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................24,00019  For Commodities...................................2,438,50020  For Printing.........................................23,20021  For Equipment.......................................165,00022  For Telecommunication Services.......................84,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................82,50024    Total                                         $45,455,00025WESTERN ILLINOIS CORRECTIONAL CENTER26  For Personal Services............................38,152,000  SB2534- 23 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1  For Student, Member, and Inmate2   Compensation.......................................434,4003  For State Contributions to4   Social Security..................................2,918,0005  For Contractual Services.........................10,634,0006  For Travel...........................................20,0007  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,8   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,3009  For Commodities...................................4,150,00010  For Printing.........................................39,70011  For Equipment.......................................150,00012  For Telecommunication Services.......................72,50013  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................221,00014    Total                                         $56,804,900 15ARTICLE 216    Section 5. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Sex Offender 18Management Board Fund to the Sex Offender Management Board for 19the purposes authorized by the Sex Offender Management Board 20Act including, but not limited to, sex offender evaluation, 21treatment, and monitoring programs and grants. Funding 22received from private sources is to be expended in accordance 23with the terms and conditions placed upon the funding.   SB2534- 24 -OMB104 00020 MJM 10020 b1ARTICLE 32    Section 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Corrections 4from the General Revenue Fund for a grant to the Illinois 5Sentencing Policy Advisory Council. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72025.